Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF285.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2225YH (2) 91 as/js H.F. 285 Section 1. Section 692A.102, subsection 1, paragraph c, 1 Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (45) Prostitution in violation of 3 section 725.1, subsection 2, paragraph âcâ . 4 Sec. 2. Section 725.1, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 2025, 5 is amended to read as follows: 6 a. Except as provided in paragraph âbâ paragraphs âbâ and 7 âcâ , a person who purchases or offers to purchase another 8 personâs services as a partner in a sex act commits an 9 aggravated misdemeanor. 10 Sec. 3. Section 725.1, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 11 by adding the following new paragraph: 12 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. A person who purchases or offers to 13 purchase services as a partner in a sex act from a person who is 14 a victim of human trafficking, as defined in section 710A.1, 15 commits a class âCâ felony. The personâs ignorance of the 16 other personâs status as a victim of human trafficking is not 17 a defense to a violation of this paragraph. Notwithstanding 18 section 902.9, subsection 1, paragraph âdâ , a person convicted 19 under this paragraph shall be sentenced to a fine of fifty 20 thousand dollars. 21 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 802.2H Prostitution. 22 An information or indictment for prostitution, in violation 23 of section 725.1, subsection 2, paragraph âcâ , shall be found 24 within ten years after the commission of the offense. 25 Sec. 5. Section 902.12, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 26 by adding the following new paragraph: 27 NEW PARAGRAPH . h. Prostitution in violation of section 28 725.1, subsection 2, paragraph âcâ . 29